Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Presumption of Abandonment

393A.040.
When property presumed abandoned.

Subject to KRS

393A.120

, the following property shall be presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner during the period specified below:

A traveler’s check, fifteen (15) years after issuance;

A money order, seven (7) years after issuance;

A state or municipal bond, bearer bond, or original-issue-discount bond, three (3) years after the earliest of the date the bond matures or is called or the obligation to pay the principal of the bond arises;

A debt of a business association, three (3) years after the obligation to pay arises;

A payroll card or demand, savings, or time deposit account, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, three (3) years after the maturity of the deposit, except a deposit that is automatically renewable is deemed matured on its initial date of maturity unless the apparent owner consented in a record on file with the holder to renewal at or about the time of the renewal, except:

Property held in an interest-bearing, demand, savings, or time deposit account shall, from the time it is presumed abandoned under this chapter, be placed by the holder in an interest-bearing account made assignable to the administrator;

The administrator may examine the records of the holder relevant to the establishment and maintenance of an interest-bearing account in accordance with this chapter;

Upon demand and proper proof by a person appearing entitled to payment of property described in this subsection, the holder may withdraw the property and any accrued interest for payment to the entitled person;

Property described in this subsection deposited and not claimed ten (10) years after it is presumed abandoned, or upon actual abandonment, shall be paid to the administrator upon whichever abandonment occurs first; and

The administrator shall not be required to credit interest on any property described in this subsection after the property is received under paragraph (d) of this subsection;

Money or a credit owed to a customer as a result of a retail business transaction, other than in-store credit for returned merchandise, three (3) years after the obligation arose;

An amount owed by an insurance company on a life or endowment insurance policy or an annuity contract that has matured or terminated, three (3) years after the obligation to pay arose under the terms of the policy or contract or, if a policy or contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death has not matured by proof of the death of the insured or annuitant, as follows:

With respect to an amount owed on a life or endowment insurance policy, three (3) years after the earlier of the date:

The insurance company has knowledge of the death of the insured; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve for the policy is based; and

With respect to an amount owed on an annuity contract, three (3) years after the date the insurance company has knowledge of the death of the annuitant;

Property distributable by a business association in the course of dissolution, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a court, including property received as proceeds of a class action, may be paid to the administrator one (1) year after the property becomes distributable, but shall be paid to the administrator no later than five (5) years after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, including municipal bond interest and unredeemed principal under the administration of a paying agent or indenture trustee, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

Property payable or distributable in the course of a demutualization of an insurance company, three (3) years after the earlier of the last contact with the policyholder, or the date the property became payable or distributable;

Wages, commissions, bonuses, or reimbursements to which an employee is entitled, or other compensation for personal services, other than amounts held in a payroll card, one (1) year after the amount becomes payable;

A deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one (1) year after the deposit or refund becomes payable;

All funds represented by unclaimed pari-mutual winning tickets held in this state by any person, association, or corporation operating a pari-mutual or similar system of betting at quarter horse or Appaloosa racetracks, two (2) years from the time the ticket became payable; and

Property not specified in KRS

393A.050

,

393A.060

,

393A.070

,

393A.080

,

393A.090

, or

393A.100

, the earlier of three (3) years after the owner first has a right to demand the property or the obligation to pay or distribute the property arises.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.050.
When tax-deferred retirement account presumed abandoned.

Subject to KRS

393A.120

, property held in a pension account or retirement account that qualifies for tax deferral under the income-tax laws of the United States shall be presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three (3) years after the later of:

The following dates:

Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service; or

If the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by the United States Postal Service; or

The earlier of the following dates:

The date the apparent owner becomes seventy and one-half (70 1/2) years of age, if determinable by the holder; or

If 26

U.S.C. secs. 1

et seq., as amended, requires distribution to avoid a tax penalty, two (2) years after the date the holder:

Receives confirmation of the death of the apparent owner in the ordinary course of its business; or

Confirms the death of the apparent owner under subsection (2) of this section.

If a holder in the ordinary course of its business receives notice or an indication of the death of an apparent owner and subsection (1)(b) of this section applies, the holder shall attempt not later than ninety (90) days after receipt of the notice or indication to confirm whether the apparent owner is deceased.

If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of an account described in subsection (1) of this section by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner’s interest in the property by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than two (2) years after the apparent owner’s last indication of interest in the property. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (3) of this section is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service, the property shall be presumed abandoned three (3) years after the later of:

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the date a second consecutive communication to contact the apparent owner sent by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered;

If the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered; or

The date established by subsection (1)(b) of this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.060.
When other tax-deferred account presumed abandoned.

Subject to KRS

393A.120

and except for property described in KRS

393A.050

and property held in a plan described in 26

U.S.C. sec. 529

A, property held in an account or plan, including a health savings account, that qualifies for tax deferral under the income-tax laws of the United States shall be presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three (3) years after the earlier of:

The date, if determinable by the holder, specified in the income-tax laws and regulations of the United States by which distribution of the property shall begin to avoid a tax penalty, with no distribution having been made; or

Thirty (30) years after the date the account was opened.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.070.
When custodial account for minor presumed abandoned.

Subject to KRS

393A.120

, property held in an account established under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, KRS

385.012

to

385.242

, shall be presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by or on behalf of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened three (3) years after the later of:

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States Postal Service;

If the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered; or

The date on which the custodian is required to transfer the property to the minor or the minor’s estate in accordance with the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of the state in which the account was opened.

If the holder does not send communications to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf an account described in subsection (1) of this section was opened by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the custodian’s interest in the property by sending the custodian an electronic-mail communication not later than two (2) years after the custodian’s last indication of interest in the property. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the custodian by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the custodian an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the custodian’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The custodian does not respond to the electronic-mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (2) of this section is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States Postal Service, the property shall be presumed abandoned three (3) years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication to contact the custodian by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service; or

The date established by subsection (1)(c) of this section.

When the property in the account described in subsection (1)(c) of this section is transferred to the minor on whose behalf an account was opened or to the minor’s estate, the property in the account shall no longer be subject to this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.080.
When contents of safe-deposit box presumed abandoned.

Tangible property held in a safe-deposit box and proceeds from a sale of the property by the holder permitted by law of this state other than this chapter are presumed abandoned if the property remains unclaimed by the apparent owner five (5) years after the earlier of the:

Expiration of the lease or rental period for the box; or

Earliest date when the lessor of the box is authorized by law of this state other than this chapter to enter the box and remove or dispose of the contents without consent or authorization of the lessee.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 8, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.090.
When stored-value card presumed abandoned.

Subject to KRS

393A.120

, the net card value of a stored-value card, other than a payroll card or a gift card, shall be presumed abandoned on the latest of three (3) years after:

December 31 of the year in which the card is issued or additional funds are deposited into it;

The most recent indication of interest in the card by the apparent owner; or

A verification or review of the balance by or on behalf of the apparent owner.

The amount presumed abandoned in a stored-value card shall be the net card value at the time it is presumed abandoned.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.100.
When security presumed abandoned.

Subject to KRS

393A.120

, a security shall be presumed abandoned three (3) years after:

The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service; or

If the second communication is made later than thirty (30) days after the first communication is returned, the date the first communication is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States Postal Service.

If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of a security by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner’s interest in the security by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than two (2) years after the apparent owner’s last indication of interest in the security. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (2) of this section is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service, the security shall be presumed abandoned three (3) years after the date the mail is returned.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.110.
When related property presumed abandoned.

At and after the time property is presumed abandoned under this chapter, any other property right or interest accrued or accruing from the property and not previously presumed abandoned shall also be presumed abandoned.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.120.
Indication of apparent owner interest in property.

The period after which property shall be presumed abandoned shall be measured from the later of:

The date the property is presumed abandoned under this chapter; or

The latest indication of interest by the apparent owner in the property.

Under this chapter, an indication of an apparent owner’s interest in property includes:

A record communicated by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held;

An oral communication by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held, if the holder or its agent contemporaneously makes and preserves a record of the fact of the apparent owner’s communication;

Presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of a dividend, interest payment, or other distribution, or evidence of receipt of a distribution made by electronic or similar means, with respect to an account, underlying security, or interest in a business association;

Activity directed by an apparent owner in the account in which the property is held, including accessing the account or information concerning the account, or a direction by the apparent owner to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or type of property held in the account;

A deposit into or withdrawal from an account at a financial organization, including an automatic deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the apparent owner other than an automatic reinvestment of dividends or interest;

Subject to subsection (5) of this section, payment of a premium on an insurance policy; and

Any other action by the apparent owner which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that the apparent owner knows that the property exists.

An action by an agent or other representative of an apparent owner, other than the holder acting as the apparent owner’s agent, shall be presumed to be an action on behalf of the apparent owner.

A communication with an apparent owner by a person other than the holder or the holder’s representative shall not be an indication of interest in the property by the apparent owner unless a record of the communication evidences the apparent owner’s knowledge of a right to the property.

If the insured dies or the insured or beneficiary of an insurance policy otherwise becomes entitled to the proceeds before depletion of the cash surrender value of the policy by operation of an automatic-premium-loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in the policy, the operation shall not prevent the policy from maturing or terminating.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 12, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.130.
Knowledge of death of insured or annuitant.

As used in this section, “death master file” means the United States Social Security Administration Death Master File or other database or service that is at least as comprehensive as the United States Social Security Administration Death Master File for determining that an individual reportedly has died.

With respect to a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death, but which has not matured by proof of death of the insured or annuitant, the company has knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant when:

The company receives a death certificate or court order determining that the insured or annuitant has died;

The company conducts a comparison for any purpose between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company’s insureds or annuitants, finds a match that provides notice that the insured or annuitant has died, and validates the death;

The administrator or the administrator’s agent conducts a comparison for the purpose of finding matches during an examination conducted under KRS

393A.550

to

393A.650

between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company’s insureds or annuitants, finds a match that provides notice that the insured or annuitant has died, and the company validates the death; or

The company:

Receives notice of the death of the insured or annuitant from an administrator, beneficiary, policy owner, relative of the insured, or trustee or from a personal representative, executor, or other legal representative of the insured’s or annuitant’s estate; and

Validates the death of the insured or annuitant.

The following rules apply under this section:

A death-master-file match under subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section occurs if the criteria for an exact or partial match are satisfied as provided by KRS

304.15-420

;

The death-master-file match shall not constitute proof of death for the purpose of submission to an insurance company of a claim by a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract for an amount due under an insurance policy or annuity contract; and

The death-master-file match or validation of the insured’s or annuitant’s death shall not alter the requirements for a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract to make a claim to receive proceeds under the terms of the policy or contract.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 13, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.140.
Deposit account for proceeds of life insurance policy or annuity contract.

If proceeds payable under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract are deposited into an account with check or draft-writing privileges for the beneficiary of the policy or contract and, under a supplementary contract not involving annuity benefits other than death benefits, the proceeds are retained by the insurance company or the financial organization where the account is held, the policy or contract includes the assets in the account.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 14, effective July 14, 2018.